Georgia, session 2025_26, HB868.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Part 1 of Article 1 of Chapter 18 of Title 45 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated,
relating to state employees' health insurance plan, is amended in Code Section 45-18-5,
relating to county officers and employees, by adding a new subsection to read as follows:
"(b.1)(1) As used in this subsection, the term:
H. B. 868
- 1 -

LC 52 0853
(A) 'County health plan' means a health insurance plan, health maintenance
organization, or other health benefits plan offered or provided by a county for its county
officers and the spouses and dependents of such officers.
(B) 'Eligible county officer' means an individual who is at least the age of 55 and no
more than the age of 65, is retiring from a position as a county officer, and has served
at least 16 years in one or more of the following capacities: probate judge, sheriff, tax
commissioner or tax collector, or clerk of the superior court.
(2) On and after December 31, 2026, any eligible county officer may elect for himself
or herself and the spouse and dependents of such officer to be included in a county health
plan. The county governing authority of such officer shall pay 75 percent of any
premiums for such plan for such officer and the spouse and dependents of such officer
until such officer reaches the age of 65; provided, however, that such premium payment
shall not exceed the savings realized by such county based on the total gross salary paid
to such officer in his or her final 12 months of service minus the total gross salary due to
an individual serving as a new county officer for that position in his or her first 12 months
of service, using salaries provided for in Code Sections 15-6-88 through 15-6-91, 15-9-63
through 15-9-66, 15-16-20, 36-5-25, and 48-5-183. A county governing authority may
elect by majority vote to pay such premium payments in a uniform manner through the
Association County Commissioners of Georgia and is authorized to contract with the
Association County Commissioners of Georgia as provided in this subsection. In the
event that such a contract is entered into, it shall be the duty of the Association County
Commissioners of Georgia to collect and remit such payments as may be required for
such officer and the spouse and dependents of such officer to be included in such plan.
The Association County Commissioners of Georgia may add a reasonable fee to the
premiums required under such plan to cover necessary administrative costs. In addition,
it shall be the duty of the Association County Commissioners of Georgia to maintain and
remit accurate records and other information as required to administer such plan pursuant
H. B. 868
- 2 -

LC 52 0853
to this subsection. Failure of the Association County Commissioners of Georgia to remit
such payments may, upon written notice to the Association County Commissioners of
Georgia and such officer, terminate the coverage for such officer and the spouse and
dependents of such officer as of the day following the last day for which such payment
was remitted. Coverage may be reinstated upon the tender of such payment not
previously remitted."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 868
- 3 -